Hawaii statutes.
§651-63 Liability for selling exempt
property. If any officer or other person seizes or sells any property
exempt from execution under subpart C, the officer or other person shall be
liable to an action at the suit of the owner for all damages and costs
sustained thereby, including an attorney's fee to be fixed by the court before
which the action is tried, and the fact that the officer or person has demanded
and received the indemnifying bond mentioned in section 651-62 shall not exempt
the officer or other person from the liability in this section specified. [L
1901, c 9, §13; RL 1925, §2457; RL 1935, §4158; RL 1945, §10185; RL 1955,
§233-62; HRS §651-63; am L 1976, c 136, pt of §4; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Liability of officer seizing property. 23 H. 584, 586
(1917).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next